Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.456

Occupational and environmental research facility—Advisory committee.

There is hereby created an advisory committee to the environmental research facility consisting of eight members. Membership on the committee shall consist of the director of the department of labor and industries, the assistant secretary for the division of health services of the department of social and health services, the president of the Washington state labor council, the president of the association of Washington business, the dean of the school of public health and community medicine of the University of Washington, the dean of the school of engineering of the University of Washington, the president of the Washington state medical association, or their representatives, and the chair of the department of environmental health of the University of Washington, who shall be ex officio chair of the committee without vote. Such committee shall meet at least semiannually at the call of the chair. Members shall serve without compensation. It shall consult, review and evaluate policies, budgets, activities, and programs of the facility relating to industrial and occupational health to the end that the facility will serve in the broadest sense the health of the worker as it may be related to his or her employment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 720; 1973 c 62 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.456. Prior: 1963 c 151 s 4. Formerly RCW 28.77.416.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.